Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1007
Poultry; sales record; violation; penalty.

Every failure, neglect or refusal to comply with the provisions of section 69-1006 shall constitute a separate violation of such section, and for each separate offense the purchaser may be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 7, p. 1281;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 131.